test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-soll_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sõll â-stem : # Noun 'embrace' - full paradigm
# 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
# 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst. â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
# 1.1.1 Sg.Ill in ʹ-e
# 1.1.1.1 Has Gradation
# 1.1.1.1.1 Monophthong
# 1.1.1.1.1.1 Homogenous Consonant
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2 Sg.Nom Extra Strong Grade
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2.1.Sg.Gen Weak Grade
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2.1.3 Sg.Ill Extra Strong Grade
     sõll+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: sõll
     sõll+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: sõõl
     sõll+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: sõõl
     sõll+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: sõʹlle
     sõll+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: sõõlâst
     sõll+N+Sg+Com+Indef: sõõlin
     sõll+N+Ess+Indef: sõllân
     sõll+N+Par+Indef: sõllâd
     sõll+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [sõõltaa, sõõltää]
     sõll+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: sõõl
     sõll+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: sõõli
     sõll+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: sõõlid
     sõll+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: sõõlid
     sõll+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: sõõlin
     sõll+N+Pl+Com+Indef: sõõlivuiʹm
     sõll+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [sõõlitaa, sõõlitää]
     sõll+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: sõõlâž
